src/fastspell_dictionaries/qu_BO.dic
achnikanpuy/V
ajllapapuy/V
akakiparichiy/V
allawñiykuy/V
allqochariy/V
amuyarimuy/V
anpuripuy/V
apaqaysiy/V
arimsakapuy/V
arqhanpuy/V
asnannachikuy/V
atillchachikapuy/V
awaykuripuy/V
ayayupachikuy/V
aypamuy/V
aywiripuy/V
ch'ajchupuy/V
ch'allanakuy/V
ch'aqchukapuy/V
ch'arwakapuy/V
ch'awkayachipuy/V
ch'illachipuy/V
ch'ipakapuy/V
ch'irwachipuy/V
ch'iwrachikuy/V
ch'ojñiyaykuy/V
ch'umariy/V
ch'usakuy/V
ch'uwanchakanpuy/V
ch'uykupuy/V
chajmachimuy/V
chakaykukuy/V
chanchachikuy/V
chanpiykukuy/V
chapullayakamuy/V
chaskichipuy/V
chayparipuy/V
chhajrarimuy/V
chhallunakuy/V
chhapchaykachamuy/V
chhasakamuy/V
chhillarichikuy/V
chhuqonachiy/V
chijcharichiy/V
chijnimuy/V
chinukanpuy/V
chirikamuy/V
chojchuchipuy/V
chuchuqanpuy/V
chullchuysiy/V
chunpichipuy/V
churataripuy/V
ichhuy/V
illachipuy/V
intupayallay/V
iskaychakanpuy/V
itumirarimuy/V
jach'uykuy/V
jallmanakuy/V
jamupayaykukuy/V
janch'akuy/V
janlluyakamuy/V
janrayakanpuy/V
jap'inysikuy/V
jaqenpuy/V
jark'amuy/V
jatunyapuy/V
jawipuy/V
jaychaykukuy/V
jayt'arimuy/V
jañakamuy/V
jinakuy/V
jipyachiy/V
jojunaysiy/V
jullaqaykukuy/V
junt'arayallay/V
jupt'ay/V
jusk'achiy/V
juyañiysiy/V
k'achanparichiy/V
k'ajtinakuy/V
k'anchallay/V
k'arkuriy/V
k'atachachipuy/V
k'ikaykachachipuy/V
k'imchulliysikuy/V
k'iray/V
k'iskichachimuy/V
k'itachikamuy/V
k'ullunnakanpuy/V
k'unkupuy/V
k'urpayanpuy/V
kachachimuy/V
kachipay/V
kallpamanallay/V
kanachikuy/V
kaqkaykachachiy/V
kaskikurimuy/V
kawsarikuy/V
khakachakuy/V
khallkikapuy/V
khanimuy/V
kharikanpuy/V
khaskachimuy/V
khipiykukuy/V
khuchinchakuy/V
khuskipayarimuy/V
khuyukamuy/V
kimraychapuy/V
kirkicharikuy/V
kullacharipuy/V
kunpakanpuy/V
kusichikanpuy/V
kutakipaykuy/V
laq'aysiy/V
lerq'oyachiy/V
llajt'ukanpuy/V
llankhachimuy/V
llant'ayakanpuy/V
llaq'achipuy/V
llasarikuy/V
llawiykacharichiy/V
llijllarichikuy/V
llinp'apuy/V
llipejyarichiy/V
lliwichariy/V
llojurikuy/V
llulluyanpuy/V
llup'inakuy/V
llust'ikanpuy/V
mach'itmaysiy/V
majiykuy/V
makurkapuy/V
mamaniripuy/V
mant'ariy/V
marachimuy/V
mast'aykukuy/V
mayllay/V
mich'anakuy/V
millallay/V
millwikamuy/V
miqachimuy/V
misk'ariy/V
mitk'aysiy/V
mojunchachipuy/V
mukakapuy/V
mullqocharipuy/V
muraysiy/V
muskikamuy/V
musyakamuy/V
muyupayakuy/V
napaykukuy/V
ninayapuy/V
onqoykuy/V
p'ajpachipuy/V
p'ankuchikuy/V
p'aqayamuy/V
p'atmakuy/V
p'ijtaysiy/V
p'itwirikuy/V
p'unpuyarimuy/V
pachajcharikuy/V
pallqopuy/V
panqomuy/V
pariakurikuy/V
pasikuriy/V
pawqachimuy/V
phajyakuy/V
pharpakanpuy/V
phawaykachakamuy/V
phishqachakanpuy/V
phojllachipuy/V
phullojtaykuy/V
phushkachiy/V
phuyuchiy/V
pijtuysiy/V
pinchiy/V
pirwachimuy/V
pituchachikuy/V
puchuykuy/V
pullpuy/V
punkiysiy/V
purunyarichimuy/V
q'achikuy/V
q'allpikamuy/V
q'apñuchikuy/V
q'asuy/V
q'eachay/V
q'ellpumuy/V
q'enqotamuy/V
q'eqokamuy/V
q'ewaykukuy/V
q'olltirimuy/V
q'osñichiy/V
qachachiy/V
qallqachikuy/V
qanchipayaykukuy/V
qarallay/V
qarwayanpuy/V
qaychukanpuy/V
qellpamuy/V
qeqayanpuy/V
qhachuykukuy/V
qhapajyaripuy/V
qhaqoy/V
qhasuchikuy/V
qhatipaysiy/V
qhechuchipuy/V
qhepanchamuy/V
qholluqayakamuy/V
qhorachiy/V
qhotuysiy/V
qollwarayallay/V
qonpimuy/V
qorichachipuy/V
qotuykuy/V
rak'irikuy/V
rankhayarikuy/V
raphapapuy/V
rarq'achanpuy/V
rawkhallay/V
rijrachikuy/V
rimapayachimuy/V
rit'illay/V
rojyanakuy/V
runakullay/V
ruphakapuy/V
ruwachipuy/V
sajwakapuy/V
saminchaykuy/V
sank'amuy/V
sapancharichikuy/V
sarayaykukuy/V
sawkachachikuy/V
saywakapuy/V
sijllarikuy/V
siminñichipuy/V
sinrupuy/V
siqachiy/V
sisiysiy/V
suk'unparimuy/V
sunt'ichimuy/V
suskhaysiy/V
suyuchanakuy/V
t'allaripuy/V
t'ijchakapuy/V
t'illumuy/V
t'ipuchimuy/V
t'iuysiy/V
t'upakamuy/V
t'uyuchikuy/V
takuririmuy/V
tarpaykukuy/V
thallakuy/V
thasnullay/V
thunkiriy/V
tijtimuy/V
tojllanpuy/V
tumpakanpuy/V
tutapaysiy/V
ukhuchachimuy/V
umyakuy/V
uparayachipuy/V
urmachikuy/V
uskakapuy/V
utqhachiy/V
uyuyniykuy/V
wajyachimuy/V
wankanpuy/V
wanunchachimuy/V
warararachikuy/V
wasukachipuy/V
wawsaykukuy/V
wayrat'ay/V
wijch'urayakamuy/V
willpuysikuy/V
wishñikapuy/V
wiñaramuy/V
yanapaykukuy/V
yaqollaykukuy/V
yumachikuy/V
ñajch'aripuy/V
ñawpinchay/V
ñukikullay/V
